Massachusetts, session 194th, H183.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 94G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
paragraph 1 of subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
(1) possessing, using, purchasing, processing and/or manufacturing not more than the 2
ounce equivalency of marijuana, marijuana concentrate, edible, beverage, and other ingestible
products combined.
SECTION 2. Section 34 of Chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the words “one ounce of marihuana” in line 18
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “two ounces of marijuana, pursuant to the
amount of marijuana that can be expunged from a record pursuant to section 100K 1/4 of
Chapter 276 of the General Laws,”.
SECTION 3. The commission shall promulgate or amend regulations as necessary to be
consistent with Sections 1-2 not later than 365 days from the effective date of this act.
of 1